src/morphology/incoming/verbtags.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@
@U.ASPECT.PFV@
@U.ASPECT.FUT@
@U.ASPECT.OPT@
@U.VV.%0@
@U.VV.H@
@U.VV.L@
@U.VV.D@
@U.TAMA.%0@
@U.TAMA.aa@
@U.TAMA.dh@
@U.TAMA.u@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@


+V

+%0
+H
+L
+D

+I
+T

+Ipfv
+Pfv
+Fut
+Opt

+Sg1
+Sg2
+Sg3
+SgIndef
+Pl1
+Pl2
+Pl3


LEXICON Root
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ Intransitive ;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ Transitive ;

LEXICON Intransitive
+V+I:0 VoiceValence ;

LEXICON Transitive
+V+T:0 VoiceValence ;


! TODO: consider leaving these out (to make 'down' easier in foma -- that way,
! we don't have to know the voice-valence marker in advance to have foma produce
! inflected forms for a given verb theme)
LEXICON VoiceValence
@U.VV.%0@ VV0 ;
@U.VV.H@ VVH ;
@U.VV.L@ VVL ;
@U.VV.D@ VVD ;

LEXICON VV0
+%0:0 Aspect ;

LEXICON VVH
+H:0 Aspect ;

LEXICON VVL
+L:0 Aspect ;

LEXICON VVD
+D:0 Aspect ;


LEXICON Aspect
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@ IPFV ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@ PFV ;
@U.ASPECT.FUT@ FUT ;
@U.ASPECT.OPT@ OPT ;

LEXICON IPFV
+Ipfv:0 PersonNumber ;

LEXICON PFV
+Pfv:0 PersonNumber ;

LEXICON FUT
+Fut:0 PersonNumber ;

LEXICON OPT
+Opt:0 PersonNumber ;

Lexicon PersonNumber
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ SG1 ;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ SG2 ;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ SG3 ;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ SGINDEF ;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ PL1 ;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ PL2 ;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ PL3 ;

Lexicon SG1
+Sg1:0 # ;

Lexicon SG2
+Sg2:0 # ;

Lexicon SG3
+Sg3:0 # ;

Lexicon SGINDEF
+SgIndef:0 # ;

Lexicon PL1
+Pl1:0 # ;

Lexicon PL2
+Pl2:0 # ;

Lexicon PL3
+Pl3:0 # ;
